Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-3207
Rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Seizure Safe Schools Act, including, but not limited to:

(1) Requirements for training programs for school employees;

(2) Procedures for the development of seizure action plans; and

(3) The content of seizure action plans.

Laws 2021, LB639, § 7.